Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.205

Hanford reservation—Promotion of sublease for nuclear-related industry.

In an effort to enhance the economy of the Tri-Cities area, the department of commerce is directed to promote the existence of the lease between the state of Washington and the federal government executed September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington, and the opportunity of subleasing the land to entities for nuclear-related industry, in agreement with the terms of the lease. When promoting the existence of the lease, the department shall work in cooperation with any associate development organization located in or near the Tri-Cities area.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2044; 1993 c 280 s 41; 1992 c 228 s 2; 1990 c 281 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Legislative findings—1992 c 228: "The legislature finds that the ninety-nine-year lease of one thousand acres of land by the state from the federal government requires that the state use any rent moneys from subleasing the land for the development of the leased land and nuclear-related industries in the Tri-Cities area. The legislature further finds that the new emphasis on waste cleanup at Hanford and the new technologies needed for environmental restoration warrant a renewed effort to promote development of the leased land and nuclear-related industries in the Tri-Cities area." [ 1992 c 228 s 1.]

Legislative findings—1990 c 281: "The legislature finds that the one thousand acres of land leased from the federal government to the state of Washington on the Hanford reservation constitutes an unmatched resource for development of high-technology industry, nuclear medicine research, and research into new waste immobilization and reduction techniques. The legislature further finds that continued diversification of the Tri-Cities economy will help stabilize and improve the Tri-Cities economy, and that this effort can be aided by emphasizing the resources of local expertise and nearby facilities." [ 1990 c 281 s 1.]